Utah statutes.
62A-5-109.   Parent liable for cost and support of minor -- Guardian liable for costs.

(1)  Parents of a person who receives services or support from the division, who are financially responsible, are liable for the cost of the actual care and maintenance of that person and for the support of the child in accordance with Title 78B, Chapter 12, Utah Child Support Act, and Title 62A, Chapter 11, Public Support of Children Act until the person reaches 18 years of age.

(2)  A guardian of a person who receives services or support from the division is liable for the cost of actual care and maintenance of that person, regardless of his age, where funds are available in the guardianship estate established on his behalf for that purpose. However, if the person who receives services is a beneficiary of a trust created in accordance with Section 62A-5-110, or if the guardianship estate meets the requirements of a trust described in that section, the trust income prior to distribution to the beneficiary, and the trust principal are not subject to payment for services or support for that person.

(3)  If, at the time a person who receives services or support from the division is discharged from a facility or program owned or operated by or under contract with the division, or after the death and burial of a resident of the developmental center, there remains in the custody of the division or the superintendent any money paid by a parent or guardian for the support or maintenance of that person, it shall be repaid upon demand.

